Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 18 Child Maltreatment Act
12-18-705. Notice if the alleged offender is at least fourteen years of age and less than eighteen years of age.

If the report was determined true and the alleged offender is at least fourteen (14) years of age and less than eighteen (18) years of age at the time the act or omission occurred, a notice shall be given as provided in this section.

The notice under this section shall be provided as follows:

If the alleged offender is in foster care, the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police shall notify the alleged offender's counsel and the legal parents, legal guardians, and current foster parents of the alleged offender; or

If the alleged offender is not in foster care, the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police shall notify the legal parents and legal guardians of the alleged offender.

The notice under this section shall include the following:

The investigative determination, excluding data that would identify the person who made the report to the Child Abuse Hotline;

A statement that the matter has been referred for an automatic administrative hearing that may be waived only by the alleged offender or his or her parent or legal guardian in writing;

The potential consequences to the alleged offender if the alleged offender's name is placed in the Child Maltreatment Central Registry;

A statement that the alleged offender has a right to have an attorney and if the person cannot afford an attorney to contact the Center for Arkansas Legal Services;

A statement that if the alleged offender's name is placed on the registry, the alleged offender's name may be automatically removed after one (1) year or the alleged offender may be able to petition for removal after one (1) year, depending on the finding;

A statement that the administrative hearing may take place in person if requested by the alleged offender, the alleged offender's parent or guardian, or the alleged offender's attorney within thirty (30) days from the date that the alleged offender receives notification under this section; and

The name of the person making the notification, his or her title or position, and current contact information.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment substituted “under eighteen (18) years of age” for “a child ten (10) years of age or older” in (a); substituted “alleged offender” for “child” or variant throughout (b)(1) and (b)(2); substituted “alleged offender” for “juvenile offender” or “alleged juvenile offender” or variant throughout (c)(2), (c)(3), and (c)(6); substituted “alleged offender” for “person” or variant throughout (c)(4) and c)(5); and deleted “to the alleged juvenile offender” following “notification” in (b)(7).

The 2013 amendment substituted “at least fourteen years of age and less than eighteen” for “under eighteen” in the section heading and (a).

The 2015 amendment inserted “and the Department of Arkansas State Police” in (b)(1).

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2011, No. 1143, § 15; 2013, No. 1006, § 19; 2015, No. 1004, § 22.

12-18-706. Notice if the alleged offender is eighteen years of age or older.

Notification to an alleged offender who was eighteen (18) years of age or older at the time of the act or omission that resulted in a true finding of child maltreatment shall include the following:

The investigative determination, excluding data that would identify the person who made the report to the Child Abuse Hotline;

A statement that the person named as the alleged offender of the true report may request an administrative hearing;

A statement that the request must be made to the Department of Human Services within thirty (30) days of receipt of the service or certified mailing of the notice of determination;

The potential consequences to the person if the person's name is placed on the Child Maltreatment Central Registry;

A statement that the person has a right to have an attorney and that if the person cannot afford an attorney to contact the Center for Arkansas Legal Services;

A statement that if the person's name is placed on the registry, the person's name may be automatically removed after one (1) year or the person may be able to petition for removal after one (1) year, depending on the finding;

The name of the person making the notification to the alleged offender, his or her title or position, and current contact information; and

A statement that the administrative hearing may take place in person if requested by the alleged offender or the alleged offender's attorney within thirty (30) days from the date that the alleged offender receives notification under this section.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment deleted “juvenile” preceding “offender” in (7).

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2011, No. 779, § 19.

12-18-707. Notice when the alleged offender works with children, the elderly, an individual with a disability, or an individual with a mental illness, is engaged in child-related activities, or is a juvenile.

If the child maltreatment investigative determination names as an alleged offender a person who is engaged in child-related activities or employment, works with the elderly, an individual with a disability, or an individual with a mental illness, or is a juvenile and the Department of Human Services or the Department of Arkansas State Police has determined that children, the elderly, or individuals with a disability or mental illness under the care of the alleged offender appear to be at risk of maltreatment by the alleged offender, the Department of Human Services or the Department of Arkansas State Police may notify the following of the investigative determination:

An alleged offender's employer;

A school superintendent, principal, or a person in an equivalent position where the alleged offender is employed;

A person in charge of a paid or volunteer activity; and

Any licensing or registering authority to the extent necessary to carry out its official responsibilities.

The Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police shall promulgate rules that will ensure that notification required under this section is specifically approved by a responsible manager in the Department of Human Services or the Department of Arkansas State Police before the notification is made.

If the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police later determine that there is no preponderance of the evidence indicating that children under the care of the alleged offender appear to be at risk, the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police shall immediately notify the previously notified person or entity of that information.

If the child maltreatment investigation names as an alleged offender a juvenile who is in a setting or circumstance where other children appear to be at risk, the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police may notify the entity or person in charge about the investigative determination.

The Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police shall promulgate rules to ensure that the notification required under this section is specifically approved by a responsible manager in the Department of Human Services or the Department of Arkansas State Police before notification is made.

If the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police later determine that there is no preponderance of the evidence indicating that other children are at risk or if the investigative determination is overturned, the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police shall immediately notify the entity or person originally notified under subdivision (d)(1) of this section of that information.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment rewrote the section heading and introductory language in (a) and added (d).

The 2015 amendment, in the introductory language of (a),inserted “or the Department of Arkansas State Police” twice and substituted the second occurrence of “Department of Human Services” for “department”.

The Court Appointed Special Advocates volunteer for any child named as the alleged victim or offender;

Any licensing or registering authority to the extent necessary to carry out its official responsibilities;

Any Department of Human Services and Department of Arkansas State Police division director or facility director receiving notice of a Child Abuse Hotline report under this chapter;

Any facility director receiving notice of a Child Abuse Hotline report under this chapter;

The attorney ad litem and Court Appointed Special Advocates volunteer for all other children in the same foster home if the child maltreatment occurred in a foster home; and

The attorney ad litem and Court Appointed Special Advocates volunteer for any child in foster care when the alleged juvenile offender or underaged juvenile offender is placed in the same placement as the attorney ad litem or Court Appointed Special Advocates volunteer's client.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “The Department of Human Services shall confirm” for “Notification of” and “upon request from the following” for “shall be provided to”; substituted “responsible” for “appropriate” in (a)(1); substituted “juvenile division of circuit court” for “circuit court judge” in (a)(2); rewrote (c)(8) and (c)(9); deleted former (b) and redesignated the following subsection accordingly; and added (c).

The 2015 amendment inserted “and the Department of Arkansas State Police” in the introductory language of (a).

The Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police shall notify each subject of the report of the investigative determination whether true or unsubstantiated.

The Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police shall notify the alleged offender's legal parents, legal guardians, and foster parents of the investigative determination if the:

Investigative determination is unsubstantiated; and

Alleged offender is:

Under eighteen (18) years of age; and

In foster care.

The Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police shall notify any family advocacy program or other person or entity designated by the military authority for the military installation to which notice must be given of child maltreatment investigations under § 12-18-508 of the investigation determination whether true or unsubstantiated.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment added (f).

The 2015 amendment inserted “and the Department of Arkansas State Police” in (b)(1).

The 2017 amendment added (g).

The alleged offender;

The department, excluding pending investigations on an employee or spouse of the Division of Children and Family Services;

Law enforcement;

The prosecuting attorney;

The responsible multidisciplinary team;

The attorney ad litem for the victim or offender;

A court-appointed special advocate volunteer for the victim or offender;

Any licensing or registering authority to the extent necessary to carry out its official responsibilities;

Any department division director or facility director receiving notice of a Child Abuse Hotline report under this chapter;

Any facility director receiving notice of a Child Abuse Hotline report under this chapter;

Any family advocacy program or other person designated by the military authority for the military installation receiving notice of a Child Abuse Hotline report under § 12-18-508;

Federal, state, and local government entities, or any agent of such entities, that have a need for such information to carry out their responsibilities under law to protect children from child maltreatment.

Acting in their official capacities under law to protect children, disclosure may be made to individual United States and Arkansas senators and representatives and their authorized staff members, but only if they agree not to permit any redisclosure of the information except for a legitimate state purpose to protect children from child maltreatment.

However, disclosure shall not be made to any committee or legislative body;

The attorney ad litem and court-appointed special advocate of a juvenile who has an open dependency-neglect case, if the alleged offender or the minor victim resides in the home or in the proposed placement location for the juvenile that is not a licensed foster home, adoptive home, shelter, or facility; and

A Child Welfare Ombudsman.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2019, No. 945, § 1, provided: “Legislative intent. It is the intent of the General Assembly to create a Child Welfare Ombudsman Division within the Arkansas Child Abuse/Rape/Domestic Violence Commission to provide for independent oversight of the child welfare system in Arkansas”.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment substituted “underaged juvenile offender” for “underaged juvenile aggressor” in (d); and substituted “responsible” for “appropriate” in (e)(5).

The 2015 amendment substituted “Department of Human Services, excluding pending investigations on an employee or spouse of the Division of Children and Family Services of the Department of Human Services” for “department” in (e)(2).

The 2017 amendment by No. 528 inserted (e)(11); and redesignated former (e)(11) as (e)(12).

The 2017 amendment by No. 713 redesignated (e)(11)(A) as (e)(11)(A)(i) [now (e)(12)(A)(i)]; added (e)(11)(A)(ii) [now (e)(12)(A)(ii)]; and made a stylistic change.

The 2017 amendment by No. 803 added (e)(12) [now (e)(13)].

The 2019 amendment by No. 590 redesignated (e)(12)(A)(i) and (e)(12)(B) as (e)(12)(B) and (e)(12)(C); added (e)(12)(A); deleted (e)(12)(A)(ii); and, in (e)(12)(B), inserted “under law to protect children, disclosure may be made to” and added “except for a legitimate state purpose to protect children from child maltreatment”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 945 added (e)(14).

Cross References. Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, §9-27-301 et seq.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “or mailing records from a child maltreatment investigative file” for “and mailing records of an investigative file” in (a)(1); and substituted “electronic media, such as audio tapes, video recordings, compact discs, or DVDs and photographs” for “tapes and photographs” in (a)(2).

Amendments. The 2015 amendment inserted “and the Department of Arkansas State Police” in (b).

However, delays in completing the administrative hearing that are attributable to either party shall not count against the limit of one hundred eighty (180) days if the administrative law judge determines that good cause for the delay is shown by the party requesting the delay and the request for delay is made in writing and delivered to the Office of Appeals and Hearings of the Department of Human Services and all other parties.

(A)The Department of Human Services shall report any failures to comply with this subsection for each quarter to the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs and the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth.

The quarterly report to the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs and the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth shall include a written explanation of the failure of the Department of Human Services.

(1)The limit of one hundred eighty (180) days for an administrative hearing under this chapter shall not apply if upon request of any party a stay is granted as permitted under this section.

The stay shall be lifted and the case set for a hearing upon the earlier of:

A petition and showing by any party that there is good cause to conduct the administrative hearing before the conclusion of the criminal or delinquency proceeding;

The final disposition of the criminal or delinquency proceeding; or

The expiration of one (1) year from the date the criminal or delinquency proceeding was filed.

A stay granted under this section may be extended after the one-year expiration upon a written notice from the requesting party that the criminal or delinquency investigation or proceeding is still ongoing.

It is the duty of the petitioner to report the final disposition of the criminal or delinquency proceeding to the office for a stay granted under this subdivision (b)(3).

The case shall be dismissed and the petitioner's name placed on the Child Maltreatment Central Registry if the petitioner fails to provide a file-marked copy of the final disposition of the criminal or delinquency proceeding within thirty (30) days of the entry of the final disposition.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment, in (a)(1)(B), substituted “either party” for “the petitioner” and added “if the administrative law judge ... and all other parties”.

The 2013 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2105 amendment added (b)(4).

Office of Appeals and Hearings properly dismissed petitioner's administrative appeal of the decision to place his name on the Child Maltreatment Central Registry because he failed to provide a file-marked copy of the final disposition of his criminal proceeding within 30 days of entry, as required by this section, despite the ALJ's letter specifically informing petitioner's counsel of the statutory requirement; there is no “good faith” exception for failure to comply with the statutory requirement.Ark. Dep't of Human Servs. v. Salcido, 2018 Ark. App. 559, 567 S.W.3d 510 (2018).

Petitioner was properly placed on the Arkansas Child Maltreatment Central Registry; the administrative hearing was not untimely because the petitioner requested a continuance and the ensuing delay was attributable to him; moreover, the ALJ did not err by failing to consider evidence of an affirmative defense because the petitioner, at the age of eighteen, engaged in sexual intercourse with a girl who was fourteen, and even though the child testified that she told the petitioner that she was sixteen years old, it was not sufficient to negate the finding of child maltreatment.Marrufo v. Ark. Dep't of Human Servs., 2013 Ark. 323, 429 S.W.3d 210 (2013).

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2013, No. 1006, § 20; 2015, No. 1026, § 11.

12-18-708. Miscellaneous notice requirements.

The Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police shall confirm an investigative determination upon request from the following:

The responsible multidisciplinary team;

The juvenile division of circuit court if the victim or offender has an open dependency-neglect or family in need of services case;

The attorney ad litem for any child who is named as the victim or offender;

If the investigative determination is true, notification of the investigative determination shall be provided to the school where the victim child is enrolled. However, the name of the alleged offender shall not be identified.

The Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police may notify the persons or entities listed in subsection (a) of this section of the investigative determination, if the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police determine the notification is necessary to ensure the health or safety of the child.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2011, No. 1143, § 16; 2015, No. 1004, § 23.

12-18-709. Confidentiality.

Notice of an investigative determination under this chapter is confidential and may be disclosed only as provided in this chapter.

(1)The Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police shall not release data that would identify the person who made the report unless a court of competent jurisdiction orders release of the information after the court has reviewed in camera the record related to the report and has found it has reason to believe that the reporter knowingly made a false report.

However, upon request, the information shall be disclosed to the prosecuting attorney or law enforcement.

(1)Any person or agency to whom disclosure is made shall not disclose to any other person a report or other information obtained pursuant to this section.

However, the person or agency is permitted to consult his or her or its own attorney regarding the information in any notice provided by the Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police.

(1)Notification of the investigative determination of severe maltreatment shall be provided to the appropriate law enforcement agency and the prosecuting attorney.

The prosecuting attorney and law enforcement may provide written notice to the Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police that the Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police do not need to provide notice of investigative determinations.

Upon receiving the notification, the Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police shall not be required to provide notification of the investigative determination.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2011, No. 1143, § 17; 2015, No. 1004, § 24; 2017, No. 528, § 3.

12-18-710. Release of information on true investigative determination pending due process.

Information on a completed true investigation pending due process as referenced in this chapter is confidential and may be disclosed only as provided in this chapter.

(1)The Department of Human Services shall not release data that would identify the person who made the report unless a court of competent jurisdiction orders release of the information after the court has reviewed in camera the record related to the report and has found it has reason to believe that the reporter knowingly made a false report.

However, upon request, the information shall be disclosed to the prosecuting attorney or law enforcement.

(1)Any person or agency to whom disclosure is made shall not disclose to any other person any information obtained pursuant to this section.

However, the person or agency is permitted to consult his or her or its own attorney regarding the information in any notice provided by the department.

The department may provide information, including protected health information, to a person or agency that provides services such as medical examination of, an assessment interview with, or diagnosis of, care for, treatment of, or supervision of a victim of maltreatment, a juvenile offender, or an underaged juvenile offender.

Information on a completed investigation, including protected health information, pending due process shall be released upon request to:

Information on a true investigative determination, including protected health information, may be released to or disclosed in a circuit court child custody case or similar case if:

No seventy-two-hour hold has been exercised under this chapter or pleadings filed pursuant to the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, §9-27-301 et seq.;

Written notice of intent to request release or disclosure is provided to the investigating agency at least five (5) days before the date for release or disclosure;

The investigating agency has the opportunity to appear before the court and be heard on the issue of release or disclosure;

The information gathered by the investigative agency is necessary for the determination of an issue before the court;

Waiting until completion of due process will jeopardize the health or safety of the child in the custody case;

A protective order is issued to prevent redisclosure of the information provided by the investigating agency or the information is released or disclosed only to the court in camera; and

Release or disclosure of the information will not compromise a criminal investigation.

Information on a true investigative determination, including protected health information, may be released to or disclosed in the circuit court if the victim or offender has an open dependency-neglect or family in need of services case before the circuit court.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2011, No. 1143, § 18; 2015, No. 1026, § 12; 2017, No. 528, § 4; 2017, No. 713, § 6; 2017, No. 803, § 3; 2019, No. 590, § 2; 2019, No. 945, § 7

12-18-711. Fee for copying investigative file.

Except as provided under subsection (b) of this section, the Department of Human Services may charge:

A reasonable fee not to exceed ten dollars ($10.00) for researching, copying, or mailing records from a child maltreatment investigative file under this chapter; and

A reasonable fee for reproducing copies of electronic media, such as audio tapes, video recordings, compact discs, or DVDs, and photographs.

A fee shall not be charged to:

A nonprofit or volunteer agency that requests searches of the investigative files; or

A person who is indigent.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2013, No. 1006, § 21.

12-18-712. Mental health services for alleged sex offenders under eighteen years of age and the victim.

If an investigative determination of a report under this chapter was determined true and the alleged sex offender is a child under eighteen (18) years of age at the time the act or omission occurred, the alleged sex offender and the victim shall be referred for mental health services, including a mental health evaluation and treatment if determined necessary by a mental health professional.

The Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police shall:

Provide the parents or legal guardians of the alleged sex offender and the victim with a list of the mental health professionals or agencies available to evaluate and treat the alleged sex offender and the victim, if necessary; and

Assist the parents or legal guardians of the alleged sex offender and the victim with a referral for a mental health evaluation, if necessary.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1200, § 1; 2015, No. 1004, § 25.

12-18-713. Reports on overturned true determinations.

(1)The Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police shall submit two (2) reports annually on true determinations made under this chapter that are administratively or judicially overturned to the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth and the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs.

The first report shall be submitted on June 1 and the second report shall be submitted on December 1.

A report submitted under subsection (a) of this section shall include:

Data on overturned true determinations by county; and

Any other information requested by the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth and the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 1025, § 1.

Subchapter 8

— Administrative Hearings

12-18-801. Time to complete administrative hearing.

(1)(A)The administrative hearing under this chapter shall begin within one hundred eighty (180) days from the date of the receipt of the request for a hearing.

The administrative law judge may stay the case upon a showing by any party that there is an ongoing criminal or delinquency investigation regarding the occurrence that is the subject of the child maltreatment report.

(A)If a criminal or delinquency proceeding is filed regarding the occurrence that is the subject of the child maltreatment report and a request for a stay is accompanied by the written notification of the date the criminal or delinquency proceeding was filed by a party, the administrative hearing shall be stayed for a period of not more than one (1) year from the date the criminal or delinquency proceeding is filed.

The administrative law judge shall stay the case upon a request by the Department of Human Services or the Department of Arkansas State Police when there is an ongoing criminal or delinquency investigation or pending criminal charges regarding the occurrence that is the subject of the child maltreatment report.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2011, No. 1143, § 19; 2013, No. 1006, § 22; 2015, No. 1026, § 13.

12-18-802. Subpoenas — Service upon a child.

If any child served with a subpoena to be a witness in an administrative hearing is a party to an open dependency-neglect or family in need of services case, the child's attorney ad litem shall be provided a copy of the subpoena.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2011, No. 1139, § 2.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment rewrote the section.

Cross References. Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, §9-27-301 et seq.

12-18-803. Privileged communications as evidence — Exception.

It is the public policy of the State of Arkansas to protect the health, safety, and the welfare of children within the state.

No privilege, except that between a lawyer and client or between a minister, including a Christian Science practitioner, and a person confessing to or being counseled by the minister shall prevent anyone from testifying concerning child maltreatment.

When a physician, psychologist, psychiatrist, or licensed counselor or therapist conducts interviews with or provides therapy to a subject of a report of suspected child maltreatment for purposes related to child maltreatment, the physician, psychologist, psychiatrist, or licensed counselor or therapist is deemed to be performing services on behalf of the child.

An adult subject of a report of suspected child maltreatment cannot invoke privilege on the child's behalf.

Cited: Riley v. State, 2012 Ark. 462 (2012).

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1.

12-18-804. Defenses and affirmative defenses.

For any act or omission of child maltreatment that would be a criminal offense or an act of delinquency, any defense or affirmative defense, including the burden of proof regarding the affirmative defense, that would apply to the criminal offense or delinquent act is also cognizable in a child maltreatment proceeding with the exception of:

A statute of limitation;

Lack of capacity as a result of mental disease or defect under § 5-2-312; and

Affirmative defenses under §§ 5-1-112 — 5-1-114.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment, in the introductory language, inserted “including the burden of proof regarding the affirmative defense” and added “with the exception of” at the end; and added (1) through (3).

Petitioner was properly placed on the Arkansas Child Maltreatment Central Registry; the administrative hearing was not untimely because the petitioner requested a continuance and the ensuing delay was attributable to him; moreover, the ALJ did not err by failing to consider evidence of an affirmative defense because the petitioner, at the age of eighteen, engaged in sexual intercourse with a girl who was fourteen, which was sexual abuse, and even though the child testified that she told the petitioner that she was sixteen years old, it was not sufficient to negate the finding of child maltreatment.Marrufo v. Ark. Dep't of Human Servs., 2013 Ark. 323, 429 S.W.3d 210 (2013).

Father placed his mental capacity at issue by arguing that due to lack of sleep, stress, and other factors, his brain functioned differently than it would if it were not experiencing those unusual conditions, and he was unable to adequately supervise his child; the Child Maltreatment Act specifically excludes lack of capacity caused by mental disease or defect as an affirmative defense, and the administrative law judge's reference to the Act was not error under the circumstances.W.N. v. Ark. Dep't of Human Servs., 2018 Ark. App. 346, 552 S.W.3d 483 (2018).

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2011, No. 1143, § 20.